California statutes. Fish and Game Code
8666.

The department may issue a revocable permit to take with set gill nets or seines, mullet or carp in the waters of the Salton Sea and in those portions of the New and Alamo Rivers upstream one mile from their mouths as marked by the department, under commercial license, subject to such restrictions as the commission deems advisable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8667.

No fish other than mullet or carp, and no mullet less than 14 inches in length may be taken or possessed by a licensed commercial fisherman while fishing in the Salton Sea or the New and Alamo Rivers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8668.

No commercial fishing under Section 8666, 8667, or 8669 shall be carried on within the boundaries of any state or federal game refuge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8669.

It is unlawful to possess gill nets, seines, or other devices capable of being used to take mullet or carp for commercial purposes, within 500 yards of the Salton Sea and those portions of the New and Alamo Rivers designated as commercial fishing waters lying in District 22, except during such open season as may be prescribed by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8670.

It is unlawful for any person to use, operate, or assist in using or operating any net to take salmon, steelhead, striped bass, sturgeon, or shad for commercial purposes in any of the tidal waters lying upstream from the Carquinez Bridge, or to possess on any boat in these waters any net the use of which is illegal in such waters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 877.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Gill and Trammel Nets [8680. - 8700.]

8680.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the best interest of the people of the state, the commercial fishing industry, and California’s marine resources that fishermen who use gill nets or trammel nets be experienced in the use of those nets.

(b) In accordance with Section 4 of Article XB of the California Constitution, this section contains the provisions in effect on January 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8681.

(a) Gill nets or trammel nets shall not be used for commercial purposes except under a revocable, nontransferable permit issued by the department. Each permittee shall keep an accurate record of his or her fishing operations in a logbook furnished by the department. The commission may suspend, revoke, or cancel a permit, license, and commercial fishing privileges pursuant to Section 7857. A permit may be revoked and canceled for a period not to exceed one year from the date of revocation.

(b) In accordance with Section 4 of Article XB of the California Constitution, this section contains the provisions in effect on January 1, 1989.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 128.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8681.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the department shall not issue or renew a gill net or trammel net permit under Section 8681.

(b) The department may renew an existing, valid permit issued under Section 8681, under regulations adopted by the commission and upon payment of the fee prescribed under Section 8683.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b) or Section 8681, until January 1, 2027, any person who has an existing, valid permit issued pursuant to Section 8681, and presents to the department satisfactory evidence that the person has taken and landed fish for commercial purposes in at least 15 of the preceding 20 years, may transfer that permit to any person otherwise qualified under the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 8682 upon payment of the fee prescribed under Section 8683.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b) or Section 8681, on and after January 1, 2027, any person who has an existing, valid permit issued pursuant to Section 8681, and presents to the department satisfactory evidence that the person has taken and landed fish for commercial purposes in at least 15 of the preceding 20 years, may transfer that permit one time to a family member pursuant to regulations adopted under Section 8682 and upon payment of the fee prescribed under Section 8683, at which point the permit shall become nontransferable.

(d) The Legislature finds
 and declares that this section is more restrictive on the use and possession of gill nets and trammel nets than the version of this section in effect on January 1, 1989, and therefore complies with Section 8610.4, and Section 4 of Article XB of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   (AB 1056)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8681.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 8681.5, any person who possessed a valid permit issued pursuant to Section 8681 and who was denied renewal of that permit, may appeal to the commission where evidence can be presented that illness or the loss of a vessel resulted in the person not meeting the qualifications for renewal or reissuance of that permit.

(b) The appeal shall be filed with the commission within 60 days of a denial of the renewal of a permit.

(c) If the commission determines that a permit is to be issued to a prior permittee under this section, a permit shall be made available to that person upon payment of required fees.

(d) In accordance with Section 4 of Article XB of the California Constitution, this section contains the provisions in effect on January 1, 1989.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8682.

(a) The commission shall establish regulations for the issuance of gill net and trammel net permits as necessary to establish an orderly gill net and trammel net fishery. In promulgating regulations, the commission shall consider recommendations of the gill net and trammel net advisory committee created pursuant to subdivision (b). The regulations shall include, but are not limited to, a requirement that persons being granted a permit have had previous experience as a crewmember of a vessel using gill nets or trammel nets or have successfully passed a proficiency test administered by the department, under such regulations as the commission shall prescribe.

(b) The director shall establish an advisory committee, consisting of fishermen experienced in the use of gill nets and trammel nets, to advise the department in developing regulations to be proposed to the commission governing the use of gill nets and trammel nets.

(c) In accordance with Section 4 of Article XB of the California Constitution, this section contains the provisions in effect on January 1, 1989.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8683.

The fee for a permit issued pursuant to Section 8681 is three hundred thirty dollars ($330).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 701, Sec. 41.   Effective September 15, 1992.   Operative April 1, 1993, by Sec. 71 of Ch. 701.)
-------------------------------------------

8684.

No incidental catch of swordfish or marlin is authorized by this article. Any swordfish or marlin caught incidentally by a gill or trammel net permittee operating under a permit issued pursuant to Section 8681 shall be delivered to the department.

A permit issued pursuant to Section 8681 shall be revoked for conviction of a violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1300, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

8685.

In Districts 1, 2, and 3, gill nets may not be possessed on any boat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8685.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, gill nets may not be used to take salmon, steelhead, or striped bass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.5.   Effective July 11, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

8685.6.

It is unlawful to sell or possess for sale any salmon, steelhead, or striped bass which were taken in California waters by the use of a gill net.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 393, Sec. 2.   Effective July 11, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

8685.7.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly purchase any salmon, steelhead, or striped bass which were taken in California waters by the use of a gill net.

For the purpose of this section, “person” includes a broker who purchases salmon, steelhead, or striped bass which were unlawfully taken by gill net for the purpose of reselling those fish.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1079, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8686.

In Districts 112, 212, and in the Trinity and Klamath River District, it is unlawful to possess any gill or trammel net with meshes over 134 inches in length, except under regulations which may be prescribed by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8687.

Except as otherwise provided in this code, drift gill nets may be used in Districts 6, 7, 8, 9, and 10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 203, Sec. 8.   Effective June 20, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

8688.

In Districts 11, 12, and 13, gill nets may be used to take only herring, subject to Article 15 (commencing with Section 8550) of Chapter 2. No gill net may be possessed on any boat in Districts 11, 12, and 13, except by persons possessing a valid permit aboard boats specifically authorized to take herring during the open seasons established by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 485, Sec. 4.   Effective October 4, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

8691.

Set gill nets and trammel nets with mesh smaller than 418 inches shall not be used or possessed on any boat taking rockfish or lingcod in ocean waters between a line extending 245° magnetic from the most westerly point of the Point Reyes headlands and a line extending 250° magnetic from the Pigeon Point Lighthouse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1511, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

8692.

Notwithstanding Section 8693, it is unlawful to use gill nets to take rockfish or lingcod in the following waters:

(a) Between a line running 240° magnetic from Santa Cruz Point and a line running 240° magnetic from Point Sur lighthouse in Monterey County in waters 100 fathoms or less in depth.

(b) Between a line running 240° magnetic from Point Sur lighthouse and a line running 240° magnetic from Pfeiffer Point in Monterey County in waters 75 fathoms or less in depth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1248, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8692.5.

(a) Not more than 1,250 fathoms (7,500 feet) of gill net or trammel net shall be fished in combination each day from any vessel for lingcod in ocean waters.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that this section, as amended by this act at the 1991–92 Regular Session of the Legislature, is more restrictive on the use and possession of gill nets and trammel nets than the provisions in effect on January 1, 1990, and therefore complies with Section 8610.4, and Section 4 of Article XB of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 94, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8693.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this code, drift gill nets and set gill nets may be used in Districts 17, 18, 19, and 20A, except for the taking of salmon.

(b) Rockfish and lingcod may be taken with drift gill nets and set gill nets in Districts 17, 18, 19, and 20A, subject to the following restrictions:

(1) Rockfish and lingcod shall not be taken between a line running due west magnetic from the lighthouse at Point Piedras Blancas and a line running due west magnetic from Point Sal in water less than 40 fathoms.

(2) Rockfish and lingcod shall not be taken between a line running 250° magnetic from the Pigeon Point Lighthouse and a line running 240° magnetic from Point Santa Cruz, inside 40 fathoms, by means of drift gill nets or set gill nets which have mesh smaller than 512 inches.

(3) Drift gill nets and set gill nets shall not be used nor shall they be possessed on any boat taking rockfish and lingcod with mesh smaller than 418 inches when used in Districts 17 and 18 north of Point Buchon, or with mesh smaller than 418 inches when used in District 18 south of Point Buchon or in District 19. Drift gill nets and set gill nets used or possessed on any boat taking rockfish and lingcod in District 17, 18, or 19, shall not be constructed of twine larger than number 6 nylon, except that the bottom 15 meshes may be constructed of heavier twine.

(4) In District 18 south of Point Sal and in District 19, drift gill nets and set gill nets shall not be used to take rockfish and lingcod with the mesh of the net in waters less than 70 fathoms in depth, except that those nets shall not be used in waters less than 100 fathoms in depth at the Sixty Mile Bank.

(5) Loads or lots of fish taken in the areas described in paragraphs 1 to 4, inclusive, may contain 200 pounds or less of rockfish and lingcod in combination, but in no instance more than 100 pounds of rockfish.

(6) Gill nets shall not be used to take rockfish in District 20A.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 589, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

8694.

In District 19A, gill nets may not be used, nor may they be possessed on any boat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8696.

Except as otherwise provided, set gill nets may be used south of a line extending 245° magnetic from the western point of the Point Reyes headlands in Marin County except for the taking of salmon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1442, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

8700.

Any line used on a gill net which shall tend to cause the webbing of such gill net to bag or hang slack shall cause such net to lose its identity as a gill net and become a trammel net.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Trammel Nets [8720. - 8725.]

8720.

“Trammel net” includes entangling nets constructed of more than one wall of webbing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8721.

In Districts 1, 2, and 3, trammel nets may not be possessed on any boat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8724.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, in Districts 10, 17, 18, and 19, drift and set trammel nets may be used if the meshes are at least 812 inches in length, except that these nets may not be used in District 18 within 750 feet of any pier or jetty, nor may they be used for the taking of salmon.

(b) This section shall become operative on August 15, 1989.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1031, Sec. 5.   Section operative August 15, 1989, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8725.

In District 19A, trammel nets may not be used, nor may they be possessed on any boat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Round Haul Nets [8750. - 8757.]

8750.

As used in this article, “round haul nets” are circle seines, and include purse seines and ring or half ring, and lampara nets.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8751.

In Districts 1, 2, and 3, round haul nets may not be possessed on any boat, except in that part of District 3 lying within the boundaries of the Moss Landing Harbor District, where round haul or any other type of nets may be possessed on any boat, and except in that part of District 2 lying within Marin County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 882.)
-------------------------------------------

8752.

In Districts 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, and 11, round haul nets may be used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 168.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8754.

(a) In Districts 16, 17, 18, and 19, round haul nets may be used, except that purse seines or ring nets may not be used in that portion of District 19 lying within three miles offshore from the line of the high-water mark along the coast of Orange County from sunrise Saturday to sunset Sunday from May 1 to September 10, inclusive.

(b) Purse seine or ring nets may not be used from May 1 to September 10, inclusive, in the following portions of District 19:

(1) Within a two-mile radius of Dana Point.

(2) Within a two-mile radius of San Mateo Point.

(3) Within two miles offshore from the line of the high-water mark along that portion of the coast of Orange County lying between the northernmost bank of the mouth of the Santa Ana River and a point on that coast six miles south therefrom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 169.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8755.

(a) In Districts 20A and 21, round haul nets may be used.

(b) In District 20, round haul nets may be used, except (1) from sunrise Saturday to sunset Sunday, in the area from a line extending three nautical miles east magnetically from the extreme easterly end of Santa Catalina Island southwesterly and northerly to a line extending three nautical miles southwest magnetically from the most southerly promontory of China Point and (2) at any time during the period commencing on June 1 and ending on September 10 in each year, in the area from a line extending three nautical miles east magnetically from the extreme easterly end of Santa Catalina Island southerly to a line extending three nautical miles southeasterly magnetically
 from the United States government light on the southeasterly end of Santa Catalina Island.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not be construed as restricting the right to use the waters therein specified for anchorage of vessels at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 170.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8756.

Salmon, steelhead, striped bass, or shad may not be taken with round haul nets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 171.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8757.

Notwithstanding Section 8661, and in addition to Sections 8754, 8755, and 8780, round haul nets may be used to take fish in those portions of Districts 19 and 20 that are closed to the use of round haul nets by Sections 8754 and 8755 and in Districts 19A and 19B, but only for use or sale of those fish for live bait and subject to the following restrictions:

(a) In Districts 19A and 19B, round haul nets may not be used within 750 feet of any public pier.

(b) It is unlawful to buy, sell, or possess in any place of business where fish are bought, sold, or processed, any dead fish taken under the authority of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 371, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Bait Nets [8780. - 8780.1.]

8780.

(a) As used in this chapter, the term “bait net” means a lampara or round haul type net, the mesh of which is constructed of twine not exceeding Standard No. 9 medium cotton seine twine or synthetic twine of equivalent size or strength. Notwithstanding Section 8757, except for drum seines and other round haul nets authorized under a permit issued by the department pursuant to this section, the nets may not have rings along the lead line or any method of pursing the bottom of the net.

(b) Bait nets may be used to take fish for bait in Districts 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 16, 17, 18, 19, 19B, 20A, 21, 118, and 118.5.

(c) In District 19A, bait nets may be used only
 to take anchovies, queenfish, white croakers, sardines, mackerel, squid, and smelt for live bait purposes only. Bait nets may not be used within 750 feet of Seal Beach Pier or Belmont Pier.

(d) No other species of fish may be taken on any boat carrying a bait net in District 19A, except that loads or lots of fish may contain not more than 18 percent, by weight of the fish, of other bait fish species taken incidentally to other fishing operations and that are mixed with other fish in the load or lot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 172.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8780.1.

The commission may, upon the recommendation of the department, adopt regulations governing the use of bait nets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 483, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Beach Nets [8800. - 8807.]

8800.

As used in this chapter, a “beach net” is any net hauled from the water to the beach or shore, and includes beach seines and haul seines.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8801.

In Districts 1, 2, and 3, beach nets may not be possessed on any boat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8802.

In Districts 8 and 9, beach nets may be used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8803.

In District 10, beach nets may be used, the meshes of which are at least 112 inches in length. In that portion of District 10 lying south of Pt. Lobos, beach nets not over 20 feet in length, the meshes of which are at least seven-eighths of an inch in length, may be used to take surf smelt only.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8804.

In District 11, beach nets may be used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8805.

In Districts 12 and 13, beach nets may not be possessed on any boat.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 312.)
-------------------------------------------

8806.

In District 18, beach nets may not be used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8807.

In District 19, beach nets, the meshes of which are at least 112 inches in length, may be used to take smelt between September 1st and January 31st.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Trawl Nets [8830. - 8843.]

8830.

“Trawl net” means a cone or funnel-shaped net which is towed or drawn through the water by a fishing vessel and includes any gear appurtenant to the net. Except as otherwise provided in this article, the use of trawl nets shall conform to federal groundfish regulations adopted pursuant to the Magnuson Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1801 et seq.).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1048, Sec. 10.   Effective September 26, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

8831.

It is unlawful for any person to use any trawl net with meshes which are less than 412 inches in length except as provided in this article or as provided by federal groundfish regulations adopted pursuant to the Magnuson Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C., Sec. 1801 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1048, Sec. 12.   Effective September 26, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

8832.

Trawl nets and Chinese shrimp nets may be used in marine and brackish waters inside of the Golden Gate Bridge to take shrimp, oriental gobies, longjaw mudsuckers, plainfin midshipmen, and staghorn sculpin only in accordance with regulations which the commission may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1117, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

8833.

(a) In Districts 4, 19, 19A, 20, 20A, and 21, trawl nets or dragnets may not be possessed.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) of this section, trawl nets and dragnets may be possessed, under such regulations as the commission shall prescribe, in Districts 4, 19, 19A, 19B, and 21.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

8834.

It is unlawful to take or possess more than 500 pounds of crabs on any boat on which any type of trawl or drag net is carried or operated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1300, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

8834.1.

It is unlawful for any person to possess salmon on board, or to land salmon from, a vessel on which exists any type of trawl net, except that salmon taken incidentally with other species with a trawl net may be possessed and landed if authorized to be taken incidentally pursuant to Section 663.10 of Part 663 of Title 50 of the Code of Federal Regulations, pursuant to a permit issued by the department under Section 1022, or pursuant to both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 477, Sec. 8.   (AB 1573)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8834.5.

South of a line extending due west, true, from Point Reyes, it is unlawful for any person on a vessel on which any type of trawl or drag net is carried or operated to take or possess Dungeness crab, as defined in Section 8275, or to transfer Dungeness crab to another vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 817, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

8835.

In Districts 6, 7, and 10, trawl nets may be used in waters not less than three nautical miles from the nearest point of land on the mainland shore.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8836.

In Districts 17, 18, and 118.5, trawl nets may be used in waters not less than three nautical miles from the nearest point of land on the mainland shore, including those portions of Monterey Bay, Estero Bay, and San Luis Obispo Bay which lie within those districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

8837.

It is unlawful to use or possess any trawl net that includes any bag or cod-end or modification thereof, other than a bag or cod-end of a single layer of webbing, except as authorized by Section 8496 or by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 483, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8840.

Chafing gear may be used or possessed but shall not be connected directly to the terminal, or closed, end of the cod-end. Except for chafing gear prescribed under federal groundfish regulations adopted pursuant to the Magnuson Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C., Sec. 1801 et seq.), all chafing gear shall have a minimum mesh size of six inches, unless only the bottom one-half, or underside, of the cod-end is covered by chafing gear, which may be of any size mesh.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1048, Sec. 16.   Effective September 26, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

8841.

(a) The commission is hereby granted authority over all state-managed bottom trawl fisheries not managed under a federal fishery management plan pursuant to the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1801 et seq.) or a state fishery management plan pursuant to Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7050), to ensure that resources are sustainably managed, to protect the health of ecosystems, and to provide for an orderly transition to sustainable gear types in situations where bottom trawling may not be compatible with these goals.

(b) The commission is hereby granted authority to manage all of the following fisheries in a manner that is consistent with this section and Part 1.7 (commencing with
 Section 7050):

(1) California halibut.

(2) Sea cucumber.

(3) Ridge-back, spot, and golden prawn.

(4) Pink shrimp.

(c) The commission is also granted authority over other types of gear targeting the same species as the bottom trawl fisheries referenced in subdivision (a) to manage in a manner that is consistent with the requirements of Part 1.7 (commencing with Section 7050).

(d) Every commercial bottom trawl vessel issued a state permit is subject to the requirements and policies of the federal groundfish observer program (50 C.F.R. 660.16).

(e) The commission
 may only authorize additional fishing areas for bottom trawls after it determines, based on the best available scientific information, that bottom trawling in those areas is sustainable, does not harm bottom habitat, and does not unreasonably conflict with other users.

(f) It is unlawful to use roller gear more than eight inches in diameter in connection with a trawl net.

(g) Commencing April 1, 2006, it is unlawful to fish commercially for prawns or pink shrimp, unless an approved bycatch reduction device is used with each net. On or before April 1, 2006, the commission shall approve one or more bycatch reduction devices for use in the bottom trawl fishery. For purposes of this subdivision, a rigid grate fish excluder device is the approved type of bycatch reduction device unless the commission, the Pacific Marine Fishery Management Council, or the National Marine Fisheries
 Service determines that a different type of fish excluder device has an equal or greater effectiveness at reducing bycatch. If the commission does not approve a bycatch reduction device prior to April 1, 2006, then a device that is approved by the Pacific Marine Fishery Management Council or the National Marine Fisheries Service shall be deemed approved by the commission.

(h) Except as provided in Section 8495 or 8842, it is unlawful to engage in bottom trawling in ocean waters of the state.

(i) This section does not apply to the use of trawl nets pursuant to a scientific research permit.

(j) The commission shall facilitate the conversion of bottom trawlers to gear that is more sustainable if the commission determines that conversion will not contribute to overcapacity or overfishing. The commission may participate
 in, and encourage programs that support, conversion to low-impact gear or capacity reduction by trawl fleets. The department may not issue new permits to bottom trawlers to replace those retired through a conversion program.

(k) No vessel may utilize bottom trawling gear without a state or federal permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 173.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

8842.

(a) Trawl nets of a design prescribed by the commission may be used or possessed to take shrimps or prawns under a permit issued by the department under regulations adopted by the commission.

Sections 8831, 8833, 8835, and 8836 do not apply to trawl nets used or possessed under a permit issued pursuant to this section.

(b) Trawling for shrimps or prawns shall be authorized only in those waters of Districts 6, 7, 10, 17, 18, and 19 that lie not less than three nautical miles from the nearest point of land on the mainland shore, and all offshore islands and the boundary line of District 19A, except that in waters lying between a line extending due west from False Cape and a line extending due west from Point Reyes, trawling is allowed not less than two nautical miles from the nearest point of land on the mainland shore until January 1, 2008.

(c) When fishing for pink shrimp (Pandalus jordani) under a permit issued pursuant to this section, it is unlawful to possess in excess of 1,500 pounds of incidentally taken fish per calendar day of a fishing trip, except Pacific whiting, shortbelly rockfish, and arrowtooth flounder, which may be taken in any amount not in excess of federal regulations. No Pacific halibut and not more than 150 pounds of California halibut shall be possessed or landed when fishing under a permit issued pursuant to this section. When fishing for ridgeback prawn and spotted prawn under a permit issued pursuant to this section, it is unlawful to possess in excess of 1,000 pounds of incidentally taken fish per trip.

(d) Commencing January 1, 2008, the commission shall permit the taking of pink shrimp not less than two nautical miles from shore in waters that lie between a line extending due west from False Cape and a line extending due west from Point Reyes from the nearest point of land on the mainland shore, if the commission finds that, upon review of information from the federal groundfish observer program and other available research and monitoring information that it determines relevant, the use of trawl gear minimizes bycatch, will not damage seafloor habitat, will not adversely affect ecosystem health, and will not impede reasonable restoration of kelp, coral, or other biogenic habitats. The commission shall pay special attention to areas where kelp and other biogenic habitats existed and where restoring those habitats is feasible, and to hard bottom areas and other substrate that may be particularly sensitive to bottom trawl impacts in making that finding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 721, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

8843.

It is unlawful to use any trawl net with cod-end mesh less than 712 inches in length and with a cod end less than 29 meshes long and a circumference of not less than 47 meshes in waters lying between one and three nautical miles from the mainland shore between a line running due west (270° true) from Point Arguello and a line running due south (180° true) from Point Mugu.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1370, Sec. 36.   Effective October 27, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Dip Nets [8870. - 8870.]

8870.

Dip nets may be used subject to the following restrictions:

(a) In Districts 1, 112, 2, 3, and 4, dip nets may not be baited, and may not measure more than six feet in greatest breadth.

(b) In District 19, hand-held dip nets 30 feet or less in greatest breadth may be used. In that district dip nets may not be used within 750 feet of any pier, wharf, jetty, or breakwater, except to take anchovies, squids, and sardines for bait, and to take smelt.

(c) In District 20, hand-held dip nets 30 feet or less in greatest breadth may be used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 763, Sec. 7.   Effective September 15, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Other Nets [8890. - 8890.]

8890.

Baited hoop nets not to exceed three feet in diameter may be used at any time in that portion of District 18 lying south of a line running east and west through Point Arguello and in District 19, to take rock crabs, red crabs, and yellow crabs only.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Other Means of Taking [9000. - 9056.]



  ARTICLE 1. Traps [9000. - 9024.]

9000.

(a) Except as expressly authorized in this article, no person shall use a trap to take any finfish, mollusk, or crustacean in the waters of this state for commercial purposes.

(b) Traps may be used to take finfish in ocean waters only as authorized by this article.

(c) Freshwater baitfish traps that are used as provided in Section 8463 are not subject to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 431, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9000.5.

For the purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Bucket trap” means a plastic bucket of five gallons or less in capacity.

(b) “Deeper nearshore species” means those finfish identified as deeper nearshore species in regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 8587.1.

(c) “General trap permit” means a valid permit to take fish for commercial purposes issued pursuant to Section 9001 that has not been suspended or revoked.

(d) “Korean trap” means a molded plastic cylinder that does not exceed 6 inches in diameter and does not exceed 24 inches in length.

(e) “Nearshore species” means those finfish identified as such in regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 8587.1.

(f) “Popup” means a mechanism capable of releasing a submerged buoy at a predetermined time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 431, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.

(a) Finfish, mollusks, or crustaceans shall not be taken by a person with traps for commercial purposes in ocean waters except under a valid general trap permit issued to that person that has not been suspended or revoked.

(b) Any person who operates or assists in operating any trap to take finfish, mollusks, or crustaceans, other than lobster or Dungeness crabs, as defined in Section 8275, or who possesses or transports finfish, mollusks, or crustaceans on any boat, barge, or vessel when any trap is aboard, shall have a general trap permit issued to that person that has not been revoked or suspended while engaged in the activity.

(c) The fee for the general trap permit shall be thirty-five dollars ($35).

(d) This section does not apply to the taking of lobster under Section 9010 or to the taking of Dungeness crab under Section 9011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.6.

Hagfish may be taken under a general trap permit, if all of the following criteria are met:

(a) Korean traps and bucket traps may be used to take only hagfish under this article.

(b) No more than a total of 500 Korean traps or a total of 200 bucket traps may be possessed aboard a vessel or in the water or combination thereof.

(c) No permittee may possess both Korean traps or bucket traps and other types of traps aboard a vessel at the same time. When Korean traps or bucket traps are being used or possessed aboard a vessel, no species of finfish other than hagfish shall be taken, possessed aboard, or sold for commercial purposes.

(d) Popups shall not be used on buoy lines attached to Korean traps or bucket traps, and shall not be possessed by a commercial fisherman aboard a vessel when taking hagfish.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 431, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9001.7.

Finfish, other than sablefish and hagfish, may be taken under a general trap permit if all of the following criteria are also met:

(a) Every person aboard the vessel possesses a valid general trap permit that has not been suspended or revoked.

(b) If nearshore species are present, at least one person aboard the vessel possesses a valid nearshore fishery permit and a nearshore fishery trap endorsement that has not been suspended or revoked.

(c) If deeper nearshore species are present, at least one person aboard the vessel possesses a valid deeper nearshore species fishery permit that has not been suspended or
 revoked.

(d) During the period from one hour after sunset to one hour before sunrise, finfish traps that are left in the water shall be unbaited with the door secured open. If, for reasons beyond the control of the permittee, all trap doors cannot be secured open prior to one hour after sunset, the permittee shall immediately notify the department.
